Utah statutes.
31A-8-206.   Powers under organization permit -- Deposit of proceeds of
subscriptions.
Sections 31A-5-207 and 31A-5-208 apply to the powers of an organization under
an organization permit and the deposit of proceeds of subscriptions, except
that there are no qualifying insurance policies as referred to in Subsection
31A-5-207(2)(a).
